en: No preservatives, no added preservatives, preservatives free, contains no preservatives
ar: بدون مواد حافظة
bg: Без консерванти
ca: Sense conservants, sense conservants afegits, lliure de conservants artificials
cs: Bez konzervantů
da: Uden konserveringsmiddel
de: Ohne Konservierungsstoffe, Ohne Zusatz von Konservierungsstoffen, Frei von Konservierungsstoffen
el: Χωρίς συντηρητικά
es: Sin conservantes, Sin conservantes añadidos, Sin conservadores, Sin conservadores añadidos
et: Ilma säilitusaineteta
fi: säilöntäaineeton, ei säilöntäaineita, ilman säilöntäaineita, ei lisättyjä säilöntäaineita, ei sisällä säilöntäaineita
fr: Sans conservateurs, sans conservateur ajouté, sans ajout de conservateur
he: ללא משמרים, ללא חומרים משמרים, ללא חומרים משמרים מלאכותיים
hr: bez konzervansa
hu: Tartósítószermentes, hozzáadott tartósítószer nélkül, tartósítószert nem tartalmaz
id: Tanpa bahan pengawet
it: Senza conservanti, Senza aggiunta di conservanti, Senza conservanti aggiunti
ja: 防腐剤不使用
ko: 방부제 없음
lt: Be konservantų, be pridėtų konservantų
lv: Bez konservantiem
ms: Tanpa bahan pengawet
nl: Conserveermiddelvrij
pl: Bez konserwantów, bez dodatku konserwantów, bez substancji konserwujących, bez dodatku substancji konserwujących
pt: Sem conservantes, sem conservantes adicionados, sem conservante, sem conservante adicionado
ro: Fără conservanți
ru: Без консервантов
sk: Bez konzervačných látok
sl: Brez konzervansov
sq: Pa konservues
sr: Bez konzervansa
sv: Utan konserveringsmedel, Innehåller inga konserveringsmedel, Bakade utan konserveringsmedel
th: ไม่ใช้วัตถุกันเสีย
tr: Koruyucu yok, Koruyucu madde içermez
uk: Без консервантів
vi: Không chất bảo quản
zh: 无防腐剂

en: No Trans Fat and preservatives
bg: Без транс мазнини и консерванти
ca: Sense greixos trans i conservants
de: Ohne Transfette und Konservierungsstoffe
es: Sin grasas trans y conservantes
fi: Ei transrasvoja eikä säilöntäaineita
fr: Sans gras trans et conservateurs
he: ללא שומנים מסוג טרנס וחומרים משמרים
hr: bez trans masnih kiselina i konzervansa, bez transmasnih kiselina i konzervansa
hu: Transzzsírmentes és tartósítószermentes
it: Senza grassi trans e conservanti
nl: Geen transvet en conserveermiddelen
pl: Bez tłuszczów trans i konserwantów
pt: Sem gordura trans e conservantes
ru: Без трансжиров и консервантов
th: ไม่มีไขมันทรานส์และสารกันเสีย

en: No dyes or preservatives, Without dyes or preservatives
bg: Без оцветители и консерванти
ca: Sense colorants ni conservants
de: Ohne Farb- oder Konservierungsstoffe
es: Sin colorantes o conservadores, Sin colorantes o conservantes
fi: väriaineeton ja säilöntäaineeton, väri- ja säilöntäaineeton, ilman väriaineita tai säilöntäaineita, ei väri- tai säilöntäaineita
fr: Sans colorants ou conservateurs, Sans ajout de colorants ni conservateurs
he: ללא צבעי מאכל או חומרים משמרים
hu: Festék- és tartósítószermentes, festék és tartósítószer nélkül, festéket és tartósítószert nem tartalmaz
it: Senza coloranti o conservanti
nl: Zonder kleurstoffen of bewaarmiddelen
pt: Sem corantes ou conservantes, sem corante ou conservante, sem corantes nem conservantes, sem corante nem conservante
ru: Без красителей и консервантов
th: ไม่เติมสีและวัตถุกันเสีย

en: No soy, soy free, without soy, free from soya
bg: Без соя, не сърържа соя
ca: Lliure de soja, Sense soja
da: Uden soja
de: Sojafrei, frei von Soja
es: Sin soja, Sin soya, Libre de soja, Libre de soya
fi: soijaton, ei soijaa, ilman soijaa
fr: sans soja, sans soya
he: ללא סויה, נטול סויה
hr: bez soje
hu: Szójamentes, szója nélkül
it: Senza soia
nl: Sojavrij
pl: Bez soi, Nie zawiera soi
pt: Sem soja, livre de soja, 0% soja
ru: Не содержит сои
sv: Utan soja
th: ไม่มีส่วนผสมของถั่วเหลือง

en: Contains soy
bg: Съдържа соя
ca: Conté soja
da: Indeholder soja
de: Enthält Soja
es: Contiene soja, Contiene soya
fi: sisältää soijaa
fr: Contient du soja
hu: Szóját tartalmaz, Szójatartalmú
it: Contiene soia
nl: bevat soya
pl: Zawiera soję
pt: Contém soja, com soja

en: No garlic
bg: Без чесън
da: Uden hvidløg
fr: Sans ail
nl: Zonder knoflook, geen knoflook, knoflookvrij
sv: Utan vitlök

en: No onion, onion free
bg: Без лук
da: Uden løg
fr: Sans onion
nl: Zonder ui, geen ui, uivrij
sv: Utan lök

en: No garlic or onion, no onion or garlic
bg: Без чесън или лук, без лук или чесън
es: Sin ajo ni cebolla, sin cebolla ni ajo
fr: Ni ail ni onion
it: Nessun aglio o cipolla, nessuna cipolla o aglio
nl: Geen knoflook of ui, geen ui of knoflook
pt: Sem alho ou cebola, sem cebola ou alho

en: Certified by Ecocert, Ecocert
ar: Ecocert
bg: Ecocert, Сертифицирано от Ecocert
ca: Certificat per Ecocert
de: Ecocert
es: Certificado por Ecocert
fi: Ecocert-sertifioitu
fr: Ecocert, Distribution certifiée par Ecocert
he: באישור Ecocert
it: Certificato da Ecocert, Ecocert
nl: Gecertificeerd door Ecocert
pt: Certificado pela Ecocert, Ecocert

en: Cacao controlled by Ecocert SA
ca: Cacau controlat per Ecocert SA
de: Kakao kontrolliert von Ecocert SA
es: Cacao controlado por Ecocert SA
fr: Cacao contrôlé par Ecocert SA
it: Cacao controllato da Ecocert SA
nl: Cacao gecontroleerd door Ecocert SA
pt: Cacau controlado por Ecocert SA

en: Certified by Ecocert Canada
fi: Ecocert Kanadan sertifioima
fr: Ecocert Canada
it: Certificato da Ecocert Canada
pt: Certificado pela Ecocert Canadá, Ecocert Canadá

en: Certified by Certipaq
ca: Certificat per Certipaq
de: Zertifiziert von Certipaq
es: Certificado por Certipaq
fi: Certipaqin sertifioima
fr: Certifié par Certipaq, Certipaq
it: Certificato da Certipaq
nl: Gecertificeerd door Certipaq
pt: Certificado pela Certipaq

en: Certified by Qualisud
ca: Certificat per Qualisud
fi: Qualisudin sertifioima
fr: Certifié par Qualisud, Certifiés par Qualisud, Qualisud
it: Certificato da Qualisud
pt: Certificado pela Qualisud

en: Certified by Agrocert, Agrocert
xx: Certified by Agrocert, Agrocert
ca: Certificat per Agrocert
fi: Agrocertin sertifioima
fr: Certifié par Agrocert, Certifiés par Agrocert, Agrocert
it: Certificato da Agrocert
pt: Certificado pela Agrocert

en: Certified by Veritas, Certified by bureau veritas
ca: Certificat per Veritas
fi: Veritasin sertifioima
fr: Certifié par bureau Veritas, Certifié par Veritas
hr: Certified by bureau veritas, Certified by Veritas
it: Certificato da Veritas
pt: Certificado pela Veritas

fr: Certifié écosocial par IBD
es: Certificado organico ibd

en: Certified by Ocacia
ca: Certificat per Ocacia
fi: Ocacian sertifioima
fr: Certifié par Ocacia, Ocacia
he: באישור Ocacia
it: Certificato da Ocacia

en: Certified by Avicert
ca: Certificat per Avicert
fi: Avicertin sertifioima
fr: Certifié par Avicert, Avicert
nl: Gecertificeerd door Avicert

en: Certified by Certisys
ca: Certificat per Certisys
fi: Certisysin sertifioima
fr: Certifié par Certisys, Certisys
it: Certificato da Certisys
nl: Gecertificeerd door Certisys

en: Certified by Certiconfiance
ca: Certificat per Certiconfiance
fi: Certificonfiancen sertifioima
fr: Certifié par Certiconfiance, Certiconfiance
it: Certificato da Certiconfiance